en: Print Servers
xx: Print Servers
cs: Tiskové servery
da: Printerservere
de: Druckerserver
es: Servidores de impresión
fr: Serveurs d'impression
it: Server di stampa
ja: プリントサーバー
nl: Afdrukservers
no: Utskriftsservere
pl: Serwery druku
pt: Servidores de impressão
ru: Принт-серверы
sv: Skrivarservrar
tr: Yazıcı Sunucuları

en: Repeaters & Transceivers
xx: Repeaters & Transceivers
cs: Opakovače a vysílače
da: Repeatere og transceivere
de: Repeater & Sende/-Empfangsgeräte
es: Repetidores y transceptores
fr: Répéteurs et émetteurs-récepteurs
it: Ripetitori e ricetrasmettitori
ja: 中継器・トランシーバー
nl: Repeaters en transceivers
no: Repeatere og transceivere
pl: Regeneratory sygnału i transceivery
pt: Repetidores e transmissores
ru: Повторители и трансиверы
sv: Repeatrar och transceivrar
tr: Repeaterlar ve Alıcı Vericiler

en: Print\, Copy\, Scan & Fax
xx: Print\, Copy\, Scan & Fax
cs: Tisk\, kopírování\, skenování a faxování
da: Udskriv\, kopiér\, scan og fax
de: Drucken\, Kopieren\, Scannen & Faxen
es: Fax\, escáner\, copiadora e impresora
fr: Impression\, copie\, numérisation et télécopie
it: Stampa\, copia\, scansione e fax
ja: プリンター・コピー機
nl: Afdrukken\, kopiëren\, scannen en faxen
no: Utskrift\, kopiering\, skanning og faks
pl: Drukowanie\, kopiowanie\, skanowanie i faksowanie
pt: Impressão\, cópia\, digitalização e fax
ru: Печать\, копирование\, сканирование и факсимильная связь
sv: Utskrift\, kopiering\, skanning och fax
tr: Yazıcı\, Fotokopi\, Tarayıcı ve Faks

en: 3D Printer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k 3D tiskárnám
da: Tilbehør til 3D-printere
de: 3D-Drucker-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para impresoras 3D
fr: Accessoires pour imprimantes 3D
it: Accessori per stampanti 3D
ja: 3Dプリンター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor 3D-printers
no: Tilbehør til 3D-skrivere
pl: Akcesoria do drukarek 3D
pt: Acessórios para impressoras 3D
ru: Принадлежности для 3D-принтеров
sv: Tillbehör för 3D-skrivare
tr: 3D Yazıcı Aksesuarları

en: 3D Printers
xx: 3D Printers
cs: 3D tiskárny
da: 3D-printere
de: 3D-Drucker
es: Impresoras 3D
fr: Imprimantes 3D
it: Stampanti 3D
ja: 3Dプリンター
nl: 3D-printers
no: 3D-skrivere
pl: Drukarki 3D
pt: Impressoras 3D
ru: Трехмерные принтеры
sv: 3D-skrivare
tr: 3B Yazıcılar

en: Printer\, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories
xx: Printer\, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k tiskárnám\, kopírkám\, skenerům a faxům
da: Tilbehør til printer\, kopimaskine og fax
de: Zubehör für Drucker\, Kopierer & Faxgeräte
es: Accesorios para máquinas de fax\, impresoras y fotocopiadoras
fr: Accessoires pour imprimantes\, copieurs et télécopieurs
it: Accessori per stampanti\, fotocopiatrici e fax
ja: プリンター・コピー機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor printers\, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines
no: Tilbehør til skrivere\, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do kopiarek\, drukarek i faksów
pt: Acessórios de máquinas de fax\, copiadoras e impressoras
ru: Принадлежности для принтеров\, копировальных аппаратов и факсов
sv: Tillbehör till skrivare\, kopiator och fax
tr: Yazıcı\, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Printer Consumables
xx: Printer Consumables
cs: Spotřební zboží pro tiskárny
da: Printer – forbrugsstoffer
de: Drucker-Verbrauchsmaterial
es: Consumibles para impresoras
fr: Matériel pour imprimante
it: Materiali di consumo stampante
ja: プリンター消耗品
nl: Verbruiksartikelen voor printer
no: Forbruksvarer til skrivere
pl: Materiały eksploatacyjne do drukarek
pt: Itens para impressora
ru: Расходные материалы для принтеров
sv: Förbrukningsvaror för skrivare
tr: Yazıcı Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Printer Drums & Drum Kits
xx: Printer Drums & Drum Kits
cs: Válce do tiskáren
da: Printer – tromlesæt
de: Druckertrommeln & Sets
es: Kits de tambores de impresoras
fr: Tambours et kits de tambour pour imprimantes
it: Kit e tamburi per stampanti
ja: プリンター用ドラム・ドラムセット
nl: Printertrommels en -trommelkits
no: Skrivertromler og trommelsett
pl: Bębny i zestawy bębnów do drukarek
pt: Kits de tambores para impressora
ru: Печатные барабаны и комплекты
sv: Trumkit för skrivare
tr: Yazıcı Tamburları ve Tambur Setleri

en: Printer Filters
xx: Printer Filters
cs: Filtry do tiskáren
da: Printer – filtre
de: Druckerfilter
es: Filtros para impresoras
fr: Filtres pour imprimante
it: Filtri per stampante
ja: プリンター用フィルター
nl: Printerfilters
no: Skriverfiltre
pl: Filtry do drukarek
pt: Filtros para impressora
ru: Фильтры для принтеров
sv: Skrivarfilter
tr: Yazıcı Filtreleri

en: Printer Maintenance Kits
xx: Printer Maintenance Kits
cs: Sady pro údržbu tiskáren
da: Printer – vedligeholdelsessæt
de: Druckerwartungssets
es: Kits de mantenimiento de impresoras
fr: Kits de maintenance pour imprimante
it: Kit di manutenzione stampanti
ja: プリンターメンテナンスキット
nl: Onderhoudskits voor printer
no: Sett for skriver-vedlikehold
pl: Zestawy do konserwacji drukarek
pt: Kits de manutenção para impressoras
ru: Комплекты обслуживания принтера
sv: Underhållskit för skrivare
tr: Yazıcı Bakım Kitleri

en: Printer Ribbons
xx: Printer Ribbons
cs: Pásky do tiskáren
da: Printer – farvebånd
de: Drucker-Farbbänder
es: Cintas para impresoras
fr: Rubans pour imprimante
it: Nastri per stampante
ja: プリンター用リボン
nl: Printerlinten
no: Skriverbånd
pl: Taśmy do drukarek
pt: Fitas para impressora
ru: Ленты для принтеров
sv: Färgband till skrivare
tr: Yazıcı Şeritleri

en: Printheads
xx: Printheads
cs: Tiskové hlavy
da: Printhoveder
de: Druckköpfe
es: Cabezales de impresión
fr: Têtes d'impression
it: Testine di stampa
ja: プリントヘッド
nl: Printerkoppen
no: Skriverhoder
pl: Głowice do drukarek
pt: Cabeças de impressão
ru: Печатающие головки
sv: Skrivarhuvuden
tr: Baskı Kafaları

en: Toner & Inkjet Cartridge Refills
xx: Toner & Inkjet Cartridge Refills
cs: Náplně do laserových a inkoustových tiskáren
da: Genopfyldelige toner- og inkjetpatroner
de: Toner & Tintenpatronen
es: Cartuchos recargados de tinta y tóner
fr: Recharges pour cartouches d'encre et toners
it: Ricambi per cartucce a getto di inchiostro e toner
ja: 充填用トナー・インクカートリッジ
nl: Navullingen voor toner- en inkjetcartridges
no: Blekk- og tonerpatroner
pl: Zestawy do napełniania kartridży
pt: Recargas de cartucho de toner e jato de tinta
ru: Заправки для картриджей с чернилами и тонером
sv: Påfyllning av toner- och bläckpatroner
tr: Toner ve Püskürtmeli Kartuş Doldurma

en: Toner & Inkjet Cartridges
xx: Toner & Inkjet Cartridges
cs: Tonery a inkousty
da: Tonere og inkjetpatroner
de: Toner- & Inkjet-Kartuschen
es: Cartuchos de tinta y tóner
fr: Cartouches d'encre et toners, Cartouches d'encre, Cartouches
it: Toner e cartucce a getto d'inchiostro
ja: トナー・インクカートリッジ
nl: Toner- en inkjetcartridges
no: Toner- og blekkpatroner
pl: Tonery i kartridże atramentowe
pt: Toner e cartuchos de tinta
ru: Картриджи с тонером и чернилами
sv: Toner och bläckstrålepatroner
tr: Toner ve Mürekkep Püskürtme Kartuşları

en: Printer Duplexers
xx: Printer Duplexers
cs: Jednotky oboustranného tisku
da: Printer – duplekser
de: Drucker-Duplexeinheiten
es: Duplexores para impresora
fr: Duplexeurs pour imprimante
it: Duplexer stampante
ja: プリンター用デュプレクサ
nl: Duplexeenheden voor printers
no: Skriver-dupleksere
pl: Dupleksy do drukarek
pt: Duplexadores para impressora
ru: Дуплексеры для принтеров
sv: Duplexenheter för skrivare
tr: Yazıcı Çift Taraflı Baskı Üniteleri

en: Printer Memory
xx: Printer Memory
cs: Paměti do tiskáren
da: Printer – hukommelse
de: Druckerspeicher
es: Memoria para impresora
fr: Mémoire pour imprimante
it: Memoria stampanti
ja: プリンター用メモリ
nl: Printergeheugen
no: Skriverminne
pl: Pamięci do drukarek
pt: Memória da impressora
ru: Память для принтеров
sv: Skrivarminnen
tr: Yazıcı Belleği

en: Printer Stands
xx: Printer Stands
cs: Stojany na tiskárny
da: Printer – borde
de: Druckertische
es: Soportes para impresoras
fr: Supports pour imprimante, Chariot d'imprimante
it: Supporti per stampante
ja: プリンター用スタンド
nl: Printertafels
no: Skriverstativer
pl: Stojaki do drukarek
pt: Suportes para impressora
ru: Стойки для принтеров
sv: Skrivarställ
tr: Yazıcı Stantları

en: Printer\, Copier & Fax Machine Replacement Parts
xx: Printer\, Copier & Fax Machine Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly k tiskárnám\, kopírkám\, skenerům a faxům
da: Reservedele til printer\, kopimaskine og fax
de: Ersatzteile für Drucker\, Kopierer & Faxgeräte
es: Piezas de repuesto para máquinas de fax\, impresoras y fotocopiadoras
fr: Pièces de rechange pour imprimantes\, copieurs et télécopieurs
it: Parti di ricambio per stampanti\, fotocopiatrici e fax
ja: プリンター・コピー機用交換部品
nl: Vervangingsonderdelen voor voor printers\, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines
no: Reservedeler til skrivere\, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner
pl: Części zamienne  do kopiarek\, drukarek i faksów
pt: Peças de reposição para máquinas de fax\, copiadoras e impressoras
ru: Детали для принтеров\, копировальных аппаратов и факсов
sv: Reservdelar till skrivare\, kopiator och fax
tr: Yazıcı\, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Yedek Parçaları

en: Printers\, Copiers & Fax Machines
xx: Printers\, Copiers & Fax Machines
cs: Tiskárny\, kopírky a faxy
da: Printere\, kopimaskiner og faxmaskiner
de: Drucker\, Kopierer & Faxgeräte
es: Impresoras\, fotocopiadoras y faxes
fr: Imprimantes\, copieurs et télécopieurs
it: Stampanti\, fotocopiatrici e fax
ja: プリンター、コピー機、ファックス
nl: Printers\, kopieer- en faxapparaten
no: Skrivere\, kopi- og faksmaskiner
pl: Drukarki\, kopiarki i faksy
pt: Impressoras\, copiadoras\, scanners e fax
ru: Принтеры\, копировальные аппараты и факсы
sv: Skrivare\, kopiatorer och faxar
tr: Yazıcılar\, Fotokopi ve Faks Makineleri

en: Printers
ar: طابعات
az: Printerlər
be: Прынтэры
bg: Принтери
cs: Tiskárny
da: Printere
de: Drucker
el: Εκτυπωτές
es: Impresoras
et: Printerid
fi: Tulostimet
fr: Imprimantes, Imprimante
ga: Printéirí
hi: प्रिंटर
hr: Pisači
hu: Nyomtatók
hy: Տպիչներ
is: Prentarar
it: Stampanti
ja: プリンター
ka: პრინტერები
kk: Принтерлер
ko: 프린터
ky: Принтерлер
lt: Spausdintuvai
lv: Printeri
mk: Печатари
mn: Хэвлэгч
mt: Printers
nl: Printers
no: Skrivere
pl: Drukarki
ps: چاپګر
pt: Impressoras
ro: Imprimante
ru: Принтеры
sd: پرنٽر
si: මුද්‍රණ යන්ත්‍ර
sk: Tlačiarne
sl: Tiskalniki
so: Daabacayaasha
sq: Printera
sr: Штампачи
sv: Skrivare
sw: Vichapishaji
tg: Принтерҳо
th: เครื่องพิมพ์
tk: Çap edijiler
tr: Yazıcılar
uk: Принтери
uz: Printerlar
vi: Máy in
xh: Abashicileli
yo: Awọn akọwe
zh: 打印机
zu: Amaphrinta